Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.190

County ferry districts—Dissolution.

A ferry district formed under this chapter may be dissolved in the manner provided in chapter 53.48 RCW, relating to port districts.

[ 2003 c 83 s 309.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Captions, part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 83: See notes following RCW 36.57A.200.